Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-3105
Payee, defined.

Payee means the person who claims the
right to receive or collect a private transfer fee payable under a private
transfer fee obligation, whether or not the person has a pecuniary interest
in the private transfer fee obligation.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 5.